District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

44-205

License requirements for physician office laboratories.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-182, § 6, 35 DCR 7718
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(bb)(2), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(dd)(2), 50 DCR 6913
Oct 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 5012(e), 52 DCR 7503

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1505.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(dd)(2) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 5012(e) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Law 7-182, see Mayor’s Order 89-211, September 15, 1989.